Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-213
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act, how cited.

Sections 77-213 to 77-218 shall be known and may be cited as the Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.

Laws 2025, LB647, § 1.